Illinois, session 104th, SB3918.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Housing Development Act is amended 5by adding Section 33.1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3805/33.1 new)7    Sec. 33.1. Home builder incentives. The Authority shall 8issue to home builders who build single-family homes in the 9State (i) certificates of exemption from the Retailers' 10Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the Service Use Tax Act, 11and the Service Occupation Tax Act and (ii) credit 12certifications against the taxes imposed under subsections (a) 13and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act. 14    Section 10. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 15adding Section 246 as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)17    Sec. 246. Home builder credit. 18    (a) A taxpayer who has been awarded a credit by the 19Illinois Housing Development Authority under Section 33.1 of 20the Illinois Housing Development Act is entitled to a credit 21against the taxes imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of   SB3918- 2 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1Section 201 of this Act. The amount of the credit shall be 20% 2of the wages paid during the taxable year to a full-time or 3part-time employee of the taxpayer.4    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 5the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 6the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 7may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 85 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 9credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 10a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 11that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 12shall be applied first. 13    (c) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 14250.  15    Section 15. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 163-5 as follows: 17    (35 ILCS 105/3-5)18    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use, which, on and after January 1, 192025, includes use by a lessee, of the following tangible 20personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:21    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 22society, association, foundation, institution, or 23organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 24organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise   SB3918- 3 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 2personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 3purpose of resale by the enterprise.4    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 5Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 6operating, or promoting the county fair.7    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 8or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 9by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 10under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 11is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 12support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 13services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 14music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 15orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 16organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 17and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 18effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 19otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 20purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 21by the Department.22    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, personal 23property purchased by a governmental body, by a corporation, 24society, association, foundation, or institution organized and 25operated exclusively for charitable, religious, or educational 26purposes, or by a not-for-profit corporation, society,   SB3918- 4 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1association, foundation, institution, or organization that has 2no compensated officers or employees and that is organized and 3operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 years of 4age or older. A limited liability company may qualify for the 5exemption under this paragraph only if the limited liability 6company is organized and operated exclusively for educational 7purposes. On and after July 1, 1987, however, no entity 8otherwise eligible for this exemption shall make tax-free 9purchases unless it has an active exemption identification 10number issued by the Department.11    (5) Until July 1, 2003, a passenger car that is a 12replacement vehicle to the extent that the purchase price of 13the car is subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.14    (6) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 152004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 16equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 17and used, and including that manufactured on special order, 18certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for graphic 19arts production, and including machinery and equipment 20purchased for lease. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 21acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 22acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change upon 23a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, graphic 24arts machinery and equipment is included in the manufacturing 25and assembling machinery and equipment exemption under 26paragraph (18).   SB3918- 5 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    (7) Farm chemicals.2    (8) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 3coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 4United States of America, or the government of any foreign 5country, and bullion.6    (9) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 7student organization affiliated with an elementary or 8secondary school located in Illinois.9    (10) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile renting, 10as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation and Use Tax 11Act.12    (11) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 13including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 14purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 15State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 16replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 17machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 18implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 19Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 20chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 21to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 22Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 23registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 24polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 25overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 26equipment under this item (11). Agricultural chemical tender   SB3918- 6 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 2motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 3on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 4of the tender is separately stated.5    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 6farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 7installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 8limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 9or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 10limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 11software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 12such equipment.13    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 14sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 15computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 16facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 17to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 18crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 19agricultural chemicals. 20    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 21also includes electrical power generation equipment used 22primarily for production agriculture. 23    This item (11) is exempt from the provisions of Section 243-90.25    (12) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 26to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier   SB3918- 7 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 2conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 3destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 4the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 5domestic stopovers.6    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 7to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 8used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 9its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 10engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 11United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 12at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 13origination to the city of final destination on the same 14aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 15that aircraft. 16    (13) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 17stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 18food and beverages purchased at retail from a retailer, to the 19extent that the proceeds of the service charge are in fact 20turned over as tips or as a substitute for tips to the 21employees who participate directly in preparing, serving, 22hosting or cleaning up the food or beverage function with 23respect to which the service charge is imposed.24    (14) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 25and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 26rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii)   SB3918- 8 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 2(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 3lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 4exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 5machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 6motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 7Vehicle Code.8    (15) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 9repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 10that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 11to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 12photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.13    (16) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 14mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 15reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 16equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 17excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 18Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 19Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 20for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 21(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 22during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 2316, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456). 24    (17) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 25equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed by the 26retailer, certified by the user to be used only for the   SB3918- 9 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for consumption 2as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel for the personal 3use of the user, and not subject to sale or resale.4    (18) Manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 5used primarily in the process of manufacturing or assembling 6tangible personal property for wholesale or retail sale or 7lease, whether that sale or lease is made directly by the 8manufacturer or by some other person, whether the materials 9used in the process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 10person, or whether that sale or lease is made apart from or as 11an incident to the seller's engaging in the service occupation 12of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, patterns, gauges, or 13other similar items of no commercial value on special order 14for a particular purchaser. The exemption provided by this 15paragraph (18) includes production related tangible personal 16property, as defined in Section 3-50, purchased on or after 17July 1, 2019. The exemption provided by this paragraph (18) 18does not include machinery and equipment used in (i) the 19generation of electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) 20the generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 21wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 22through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment of 23water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 24customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The provisions 25of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the 26meaning and scope of this exemption. Beginning on July 1,   SB3918- 10 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b12017, the exemption provided by this paragraph (18) includes, 2but is not limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, 3as defined in paragraph (6) of this Section. 4    (19) Personal property delivered to a purchaser or 5purchaser's donee inside Illinois when the purchase order for 6that personal property was received by a florist located 7outside Illinois who has a florist located inside Illinois 8deliver the personal property.9    (20) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 10for direct agricultural production.11    (21) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 12meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 13Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 14Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 15Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 16racing for prizes. This item (21) is exempt from the 17provisions of Section 3-90, and the exemption provided for 18under this item (21) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 191995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 20January 1, 2008 for such taxes paid during the period 21beginning May 30, 2000 and ending on January 1, 2008. 22    (22) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 23any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 24analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 25lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 26longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would   SB3918- 11 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 2hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 3identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 4the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 5in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 6in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 7the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 8the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 9at the time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 10collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 11that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 12this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 13tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 14collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 15have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 16lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 17for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 18Department.19    (23) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 20the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 21in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 22the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 23been issued an active sales tax exemption identification 24number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 25Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 26does not qualify for this exemption or used in any other   SB3918- 12 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 2imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case 3may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 4time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 5attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 6purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 7Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 8has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 9collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 10have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 11lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 12for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 13Department.14    (24) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 16before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 17for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 18disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 19manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 20corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 21that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 22number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 23who reside within the declared disaster area.24    (25) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 25December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 26before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in   SB3918- 13 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 2including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 3access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 4water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 5purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 6facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 7State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 8Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 9in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 10disaster.11    (26) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 12at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 13used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 14provisions of Section 3-90.15    (27) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 161-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 17corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 18foundation, or institution that is determined by the 19Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 20educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 21corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 22foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 23for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 24schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 25useful branches of learning by methods common to public 26schools and that compare favorably in their scope and   SB3918- 14 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 2schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 3organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 4study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 5individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 6technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 7occupation.8    (28) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 9including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 10benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 11a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 12the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 13district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 14parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 15does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 16private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 17entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 18another individual or entity that sold the property for the 19purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 20from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 21exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.22    (29) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 232001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 24serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 25other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 26Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines   SB3918- 15 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 2amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 3paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 4commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 5paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.6    (30) Beginning January 1, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 7food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 8premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 9soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 10consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 11drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 12materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 13use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 14assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 15resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 16the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 17in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 18Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.19    (31) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 20Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 21utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 22diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 23purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 24of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 25lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 26Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption   SB3918- 16 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 2the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 3in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 4in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 5the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 6the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 7at the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 8collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 9that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 10this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 11tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 12collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 13have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 14lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 15for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 16Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 17Section 3-90.18    (32) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 19Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 20who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 21executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 22subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 23that has been issued an active sales tax exemption 24identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 25the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased 26in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or used in   SB3918- 17 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the 2tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the 3case may be, based on the fair market value of the property at 4the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect 5or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 6purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 7Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 8has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 9collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 10have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 11lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 12for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 13Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 14Section 3-90.15    (33) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 2004, 16the use in this State of motor vehicles of the second division 17with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds and that 18are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 19Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on 20July 1, 2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State 21of motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 22vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that are 23subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 24Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and (iii) that 25are primarily used for commercial purposes. Through June 30, 262005, this exemption applies to repair and replacement parts   SB3918- 18 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1added after the initial purchase of such a motor vehicle if 2that motor vehicle is used in a manner that would qualify for 3the rolling stock exemption otherwise provided for in this 4Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "used for 5commercial purposes" means the transportation of persons or 6property in furtherance of any commercial or industrial 7enterprise, whether for-hire or not. 8    (34) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 9used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 10supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 11Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 12corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 13under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 14paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.15    (35) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 16December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 17and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 18of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 19repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 20includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 21refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 22maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 23exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 24components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 25replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 26power plants, whether such engines or power plants are   SB3918- 19 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 2supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 3sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 4latex gloves, and protective films. 5    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 631, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 7tangible personal property by persons who modify, refurbish, 8complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 9hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 10approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 11Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 12operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 13Regulations. From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, 14this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying tangible 15personal property by: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, 16complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 17hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 18approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 19Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 20operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 21Regulations; and (B) persons who engage in the modification, 22replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 23power plants without regard to whether or not those persons 24meet the qualifications of item (A). 25    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 26commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air   SB3918- 20 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 2129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 3this paragraph (35) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 4existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 5exemption under this paragraph (35) applies continuously from 6January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 7for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 8the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 9and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 10101-629).11    (36) Tangible personal property purchased by a 12public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1311-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 14constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 15only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 16transferred to the municipality without any further 17consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 18of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 19retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 20instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 21connection with the development of the municipal convention 22hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 23corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 24Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 25of Section 3-90. 26    (37) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31,   SB3918- 21 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b12026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 2    (38) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental Purchase 3Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser must certify 4that the item is purchased to be rented subject to a 5rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the Rental-Purchase 6Agreement Act, and provide proof of registration under the 7Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act. This 8paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.9    (39) Tangible personal property purchased by a purchaser 10who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 11federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 12Section 3-90.13    (40) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 14construction or operation of a data center that has been 15granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 16Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 17personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 18tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 19of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 20have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 211, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect may apply for and 22obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 23equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 24supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 25purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 26qualified.   SB3918- 22 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 2grant a certificate of exemption under this item (40) to 3qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 4Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 6    For the purposes of this item (40): 7        "Data center" means a building or a series of 8    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 9    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 10    the State of Illinois. 11        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 12    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 13    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 14    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 15    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 16    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 17    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 18    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 19    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 20    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 21    systems; other cabling; and other data center 22    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 23    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 24    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 25    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 26    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to   SB3918- 23 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 2    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 3    personal property; and all other tangible personal 4    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 5    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 6    property" also includes building materials physically 7    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 8    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 9    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 10    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 11    Economic Opportunity. 12    This item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 133-90. 14    (41) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 15collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 16item (41) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. As 17used in this item (41): 18        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 19    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 20    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 21    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 22    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 23    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 24    time of sale. 25        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 26    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed   SB3918- 24 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 2    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 3    milk until it is ready for consumption. 4        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 5    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 6    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 7    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 8    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 9    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 10    milk storage bags. 11        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 12    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 13    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 14    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 15    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 16    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 17    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 18    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 19    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 20    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 21    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 22    or distributor. 23        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 24    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 25    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 26    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice   SB3918- 25 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 2    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 3    manufacturer or distributor. 4    (42) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 5the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 6Property Act. This item (42) is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-90. 8    (43) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 9property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 10forces of the United States who presents valid military 11identification and purchases the property using a form of 12payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 13of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 14prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 15transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 16paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 17the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 18years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 19States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 20Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 21Section 3-90. 22    (44) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 23to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 24intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 25Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 26Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This item   SB3918- 26 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1(44) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 2    (45) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 3Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 4consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 5alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 6use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 7prepared for immediate consumption). This item (45) is exempt 8from the provisions of Section 3-90. 9    (46) Use by the lessee of the following leased tangible 10personal property:11        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 12    meets the following requirements:13            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 14        by the licensor and the customer;15                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 16            customer accepts the license by means of an 17            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 18            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 19            the license will comply with this requirement;20                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 21            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 22            agree" does not comply with this requirement;23            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 24        use of the software;25            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 26        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third   SB3918- 27 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1        party (except to a related party) without the 2        permission and continued control of the licensor;3            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 4        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 5        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 6        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 7        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 8        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 9        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 10        the licensor; and11            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 12        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 13        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 14        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 15        forth in the license agreement; and16        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 17    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 18    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 19    January 1, 2023. 20    (47) Tangible personal property to be incorporated into 21the construction of a single-family home in the State by a home 22builder who has been issued a certificate of exemption by the 23Illinois Housing Development Authority under Section 33.1 of 24the Illinois Housing Development Act. This item (47) is exempt 25from the provisions of Section 3-90. 26(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-23;   SB3918- 28 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1103-9, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 26-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 3eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 4103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 5    Section 20. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 6Section 3-5 as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 110/3-5)8    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use of the following tangible 9personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:10    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 11society, association, foundation, institution, or 12organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 13organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 14for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 15personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 16purpose of resale by the enterprise.17    (2) Personal property purchased by a non-profit Illinois 18county fair association for use in conducting, operating, or 19promoting the county fair.20    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 21or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 22by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 23under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 24is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or   SB3918- 29 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 2services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 3music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 4orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 5organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 6and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 7effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 8otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 9purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 10by the Department.11    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 12coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 13United States of America, or the government of any foreign 14country, and bullion.15    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 162004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 17equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 18and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 19purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 20primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 21chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 22chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 23immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 24July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 25in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 26exemption under Section 2 of this Act.  SB3918- 30 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    (6) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 2student organization affiliated with an elementary or 3secondary school located in Illinois.4    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 5including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 6purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 7State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 8replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 9machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 10implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 11Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 12chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 13to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 14Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 15registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 16polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 17overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 18equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 19tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 20motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 21on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 22of the tender is separately stated.23    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 24farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 25installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 26limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders,   SB3918- 31 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 2limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 3software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 4such equipment.5    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 6sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 7computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 8facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 9to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 10crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 11agricultural chemicals. 12    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 13also includes electrical power generation equipment used 14primarily for production agriculture. 15    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 163-75.17    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 18to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 19to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 20conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 21destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 22the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 23domestic stopovers.24    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 25to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 26used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of   SB3918- 32 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 2engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 3United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 4at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 5origination to the city of final destination on the same 6aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 7that aircraft. 8    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 9stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 10food and beverages acquired as an incident to the purchase of a 11service from a serviceman, to the extent that the proceeds of 12the service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 13substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 14in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 15beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 16imposed.17    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 18and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 19rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 20pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 21(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 22lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 23exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 24machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 25motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 26Vehicle Code.  SB3918- 33 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    (11) Proceeds from the sale of photoprocessing machinery 2and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both 3new and used, including that manufactured on special order, 4certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for 5photoprocessing, and including photoprocessing machinery and 6equipment purchased for lease.7    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 8mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 9reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 10equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 11excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 12Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 13Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 14for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 15(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 16during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1716, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).18    (13) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 19for direct agricultural production.20    (14) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 21meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 22Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 23Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 24Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 25racing for prizes. This item (14) is exempt from the 26provisions of Section 3-75, and the exemption provided for   SB3918- 34 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1under this item (14) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 21995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 3January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 4such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 5ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 695-88).7    (15) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 8any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 9analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 10lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 11longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 12otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 13hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 14identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 15the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 16in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 17in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 18the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 19may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 20time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 21attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 24been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 25such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 26right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If,   SB3918- 35 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 2reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department.4    (16) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 5the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 6in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 7the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 8been issued an active tax exemption identification number by 9the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation 10Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that does not 11qualify for this exemption or is used in any other non-exempt 12manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax imposed under 13this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, based on the 14fair market value of the property at the time the 15non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 16to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 17reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 18Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 19by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 20from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 21refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 22amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 23is liable to pay that amount to the Department.24    (17) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 25December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 26before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated   SB3918- 36 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 2disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 3manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 4corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 5that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 6number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 7who reside within the declared disaster area.8    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 9December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 10before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 11the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 12including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 13access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 14water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 15purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 16facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 17State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 18Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 19in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 20disaster.21    (19) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 22at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 23used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 24provisions of Section 3-75.25    (20) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 261-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a   SB3918- 37 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 2foundation, or institution that is determined by the 3Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 4educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 5corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 6foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 7for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 8schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 9useful branches of learning by methods common to public 10schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 11intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 12schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 13organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 14study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 15individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 16technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 17occupation.18    (21) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 19including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 20benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 21a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 22the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 23district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 24parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 25does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 26private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising   SB3918- 38 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 2another individual or entity that sold the property for the 3purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 4from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 5exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.6    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 72001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 8serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 9other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 10Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 11and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 12amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 13paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 14commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 15paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.16    (23) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 17food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 18premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 19soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 20consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 21drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 22materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 23use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 24assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 25resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 26the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined   SB3918- 39 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 2Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.3    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 4Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 5utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 6diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 7purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 8of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 9lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 10Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 11identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 12the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 13in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 14in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 15the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 16may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 17time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 18attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 19purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 20Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 21been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 22such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 23right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 24however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 25reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 26Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of   SB3918- 40 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1Section 3-75.2    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 3Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 4who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 5executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 6subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 7that has been issued an active tax exemption identification 8number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 9Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 10does not qualify for this exemption or is used in any other 11nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 12imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, 13based on the fair market value of the property at the time the 14nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 15to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 16reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 17Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 18by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 19from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 20refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 21amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 22is liable to pay that amount to the Department. This paragraph 23is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.24    (26) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 25used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 26supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental   SB3918- 41 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 2corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 3under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 4paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 5    (27) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 7and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 8of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 9repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 10includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 12maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 13exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 14components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 15replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 16power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 17installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 18supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 19sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 20latex gloves, and protective films. 21    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2231, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 23tangible personal property transferred incident to the 24modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 25or maintenance of aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 26Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved   SB3918- 42 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 2have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 3accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 4From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption 5applies only to the use of qualifying tangible personal 6property transferred incident to: (A) the modification, 7refurbishment, completion, repair, replacement, or maintenance 8of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air Agency 9Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved repair 10station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a 11Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance 12with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) the 13modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft 14engines or power plants without regard to whether or not those 15persons meet the qualifications of item (A).16    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 17commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 18service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 19129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 20this paragraph (27) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 21existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 22exemption under this paragraph (27) applies continuously from 23January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 24for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 25the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 26and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act   SB3918- 43 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1101-629).2    (28) Tangible personal property purchased by a 3public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 411-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 5constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 6only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 7transferred to the municipality without any further 8consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 9of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 10retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 11instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 12connection with the development of the municipal convention 13hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 14corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 15Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 16of Section 3-75. 17    (29) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 182026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 19    (30) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 20who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 21federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 22Section 3-75. 23    (31) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 24construction or operation of a data center that has been 25granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 26Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible   SB3918- 44 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 2tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 3of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 4have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 51, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 6obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 7equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 8supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 9purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 10qualified. 11    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 12grant a certificate of exemption under this item (31) to 13qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 14Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 15Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 16    For the purposes of this item (31): 17        "Data center" means a building or a series of 18    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 19    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 20    the State of Illinois. 21        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 22    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 23    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 24    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 25    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 26    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets;   SB3918- 45 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 2    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 3    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 4    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 5    systems; other cabling; and other data center 6    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 7    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 8    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 9    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 10    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 11    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 12    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 13    personal property; and all other tangible personal 14    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 15    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 16    property" also includes building materials physically 17    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 18    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 19    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 20    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 21    Economic Opportunity. 22    This item (31) is exempt from the provisions of Section 233-75. 24    (32) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 25collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 26item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. As   SB3918- 46 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1used in this item (32): 2        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 3    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 4    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 5    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 6    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 7    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 8    time of sale. 9        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 10    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 11    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 12    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 13    milk until it is ready for consumption. 14        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 15    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 16    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 17    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 18    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 19    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 20    milk storage bags. 21        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 22    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 23    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 24    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 25    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 26    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast   SB3918- 47 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 2    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 3    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 4    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 5    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 6    or distributor. 7        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 8    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 9    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 10    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 11    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 12    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 13    manufacturer or distributor. 14    (33) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 15the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 16Property Act. This item (33) is exempt from the provisions of 17Section 3-75. 18    (34) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 19property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 20forces of the United States who presents valid military 21identification and purchases the property using a form of 22payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 23of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 24prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 25transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 26paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of   SB3918- 48 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 2years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 3States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 4Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 5Section 3-75. 6    (35) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 7to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 8intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 9Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 10Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 11paragraph (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 12    (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 13Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 14transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 15or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an entity licensed under 16the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 17Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 18Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 19Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 20an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 21Facilities Act. This item (36) is exempt from the provisions 22of Section 3-75. 23    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 24Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 25consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 26alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult   SB3918- 49 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 2prepared for immediate consumption). This item (37) is exempt 3from the provisions of Section 3-75. 4    (38) Use by a lessee of the following leased tangible 5personal property:6        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 7    meets the following requirements:8            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 9        by the licensor and the customer;10                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 11            customer accepts the license by means of an 12            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 13            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 14            the license will comply with this requirement;15                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 16            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 17            agree" does not comply with this requirement;18            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 19        use of the software;20            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 21        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 22        party (except to a related party) without the 23        permission and continued control of the licensor;24            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 25        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 26        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to   SB3918- 50 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 2        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 3        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 4        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 5        the licensor; and6            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 7        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 8        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 9        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 10        forth in the license agreement; and11        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 12    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 13    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 14    January 1, 2023. 15    (39) Tangible personal property to be incorporated into 16the construction of a single-family home in the State by a home 17builder who has been issued a certificate of exemption by the 18Illinois Housing Development Authority under Section 33.1 of 19the Illinois Housing Development Act. This item (39) is exempt 20from the provisions of Section 3-75. 21(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-10, eff. 6-7-23; 22103-9, Article 15, Section 15-10, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 236-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 24eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 25103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 268-15-25.)   SB3918- 51 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    Section 25. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 2changing Section 3-5 as follows: 3    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)4    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 5property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:6    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 7association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 8than a limited liability company, that is organized and 9operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 10benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 11property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 12of resale by the enterprise.13    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 14Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 15operating, or promoting the county fair.16    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 17or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 18by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 19under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 20is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 21support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 22services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 23music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 24orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service   SB3918- 52 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 2and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 3effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 4otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 5purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 6by the Department.7    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 8coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 9United States of America, or the government of any foreign 10country, and bullion.11    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 122004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 13equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 14and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 15purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 16primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 17chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 18chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 19immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 20July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 21in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 22exemption under Section 2 of this Act.23    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 24organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 25located in Illinois.26    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used,   SB3918- 53 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 2purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 3State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 4replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 5machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 6implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 7Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 8chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 9to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 10Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 11registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 12polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 13overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 14equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 15tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 16motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 17on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 18of the tender is separately stated.19    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 20farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 21installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 22limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 23or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 24limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 25software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 26such equipment.  SB3918- 54 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 2sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 3computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 4facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 5to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 6crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 7agricultural chemicals. 8    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 9also includes electrical power generation equipment used 10primarily for production agriculture. 11    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 123-55.13    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 14to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 15to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 16conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 17destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 18the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 19domestic stopovers.20    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 21to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 22used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 23its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 24engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 25United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 26at least one individual or package for hire from the city of   SB3918- 55 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1origination to the city of final destination on the same 2aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 3that aircraft. 4    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 5stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 6food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 7service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 8substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 9in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 10beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 11imposed.12    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 13and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 14rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 15pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 16(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 17lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 18exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 19machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 20motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 21Vehicle Code.22    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 23repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 24that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 25to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 26photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.  SB3918- 56 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 2mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 3reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 4equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 5excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 6Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 7Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 8for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 9(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 10during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1116, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).12    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 13food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 14premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 15soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 16consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines, 17drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 18materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 19use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 20assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 21resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 22the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 23in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 24Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.25    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 26for direct agricultural production.  SB3918- 57 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 2meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 3Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 4Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 5Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 6racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 7provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 8under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 91995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 10January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 11such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 12ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1395-88).14    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 15any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 16analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor 17who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 18executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 19hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 20identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 21the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.22    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 23property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 24effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 25has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 26by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers'   SB3918- 58 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1Occupation Tax Act.2    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 3December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 4before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 5for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 6disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 7manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 8corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 9that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 10number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 11who reside within the declared disaster area.12    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 13December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 14before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 15the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 16including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 17access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 18water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 19purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 20facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 21State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 22Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 23in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 24disaster.25    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 26"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used   SB3918- 59 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 2provisions of Section 3-55.3    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 41-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 5corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 6foundation, or institution that is determined by the 7Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 8educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 9corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 10foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 11for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 12schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 13useful branches of learning by methods common to public 14schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 15intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 16schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 17organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 18study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 19individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 20technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 21occupation.22    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 23including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 24benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 25a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 26the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school   SB3918- 60 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 2parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 3does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 4private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 5entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 6another individual or entity that sold the property for the 7purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 8from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 9exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.10    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 112001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 12serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 13other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 14Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 15and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 16amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 17paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 18commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 19paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.20    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 21Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 22utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 23diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 24a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 25longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 26hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption   SB3918- 61 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 2the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 3from the provisions of Section 3-55.4    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 5Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 6leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 7executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 8governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 9identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 10the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 11from the provisions of Section 3-55.12    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 132016, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 14retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 15activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 16in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i) 17for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 18State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 19State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 20or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 21tangible personal property to be transported outside this 22State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 23State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 24adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 25Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 26with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under   SB3918- 62 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 2(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 3manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 4purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 5from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 6all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 7consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 8the State of Illinois.9    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 10used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 11supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 12Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 13corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 14under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 15paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 16    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a 17public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1811-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 19constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 20only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 21transferred to the municipality without any further 22consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 23of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 24retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 25instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 26connection with the development of the municipal convention   SB3918- 63 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 2corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 3Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 4of Section 3-55. 5    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 7and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 8of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 9repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 10includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 12maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 13exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 14components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 15replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 16power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 17installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 18supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 19sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 20latex gloves, and protective films. 21    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2231, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 23qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 24modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 25or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 26Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved   SB3918- 64 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 2have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 3accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 4The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 5commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 6service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 7129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 8through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 9transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 10(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 11replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 12hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 13approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 14Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 15operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 16Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair, 17and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 18regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 19of item (A).20    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 2198-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 22General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 23applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 242024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 25taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 26or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the   SB3918- 65 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1effective date of Public Act 101-629).2    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 32026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 4    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 5who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 6paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 7    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 8construction or operation of a data center that has been 9granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 10Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 11personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 12tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 13of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 14have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 151, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 16obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 17equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 18supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 19purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 20qualified. 21    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 22grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 23qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 24Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 25Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 26    For the purposes of this item (32):   SB3918- 66 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1        "Data center" means a building or a series of 2    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 3    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 4    the State of Illinois. 5        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 6    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 7    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 8    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 9    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 10    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 11    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 12    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 13    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 14    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 15    systems; other cabling; and other data center 16    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 17    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 18    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 19    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 20    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 21    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 22    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 23    personal property; and all other tangible personal 24    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 25    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 26    property" also includes building materials physically   SB3918- 67 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 2    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 3    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 4    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 5    Economic Opportunity. 6    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 73-55. 8    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 9collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 10item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 11used in this item (33): 12        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 13    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 14    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 15    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 16    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 17    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 18    time of sale. 19        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 20    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 21    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 22    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 23    milk until it is ready for consumption. 24        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 25    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 26    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters;   SB3918- 68 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 2    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 3    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 4    milk storage bags. 5        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 6    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 7    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 8    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 9    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 10    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 11    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 12    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 13    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 14    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 15    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 16    or distributor. 17        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 18    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 19    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 20    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 21    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 22    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 23    manufacturer or distributor. 24    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 25the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 26Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of   SB3918- 69 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1Section 3-55.2    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 3property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 4forces of the United States who presents valid military 5identification and purchases the property using a form of 6payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 7of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 8prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 9transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 10paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 11the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 12years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 13States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 14Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 15Section 3-55. 16    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 17to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 18intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 19Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 20Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 21paragraph (36) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 22    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 23Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 24transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 25or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 26Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the   SB3918- 70 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 2Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 3Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 4an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 5Facilities Act. This item (37) is exempt from the provisions 6of Section 3-55. 7    (38) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 8Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 9consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 10alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 11use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 12prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) is exempt 13from the provisions of Section 3-55. 14    (39) The lease of the following tangible personal 15property:16        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 17    that meets the following requirements:18            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 19        by the licensor and the customer;20                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 21            customer accepts the license by means of an 22            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 23            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 24            the license will comply with this requirement;25                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 26            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I   SB3918- 71 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1            agree" does not comply with this requirement;2            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 3        use of the software;4            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 5        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 6        party (except to a related party) without the 7        permission and continued control of the licensor;8            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 9        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 10        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 11        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 12        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 13        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 14        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 15        the licensor; and16            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 17        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 18        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 19        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 20        forth in the license agreement; and21        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 22    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 23    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 24    January 1, 2023. 25    (40) Tangible personal property to be incorporated into 26the construction of a single-family home in the State by a home   SB3918- 72 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1builder who has been issued a certificate of exemption by the 2Illinois Housing Development Authority under Section 33.1 of 3the Illinois Housing Development Act. This item (40) is exempt 4from the provisions of Section 3-55. 5(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 6103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 76-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 8eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 108-15-25.) 11    Section 30. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 12by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 13    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)14    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 15the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 16lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 17from the tax imposed by this Act:18        (1) Farm chemicals.19        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 20    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 21    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 22    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 23    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 24    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased   SB3918- 73 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 2    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 3    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 4    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 5    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 6    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 7    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 8    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 9    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 10    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 11    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 12    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 13    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 14    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 15    stated.16        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 17    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 18    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 19    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 20    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 21    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 22    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 23    mapping systems, and other such equipment.24        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 25    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 26    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture   SB3918- 74 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 2    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 3    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 4    diets and agricultural chemicals. 5        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 6    equipment also includes electrical power generation 7    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 8        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 9    2-70.10        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 11    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 12    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 13    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 14    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 15    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 16    or resale.17        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 18    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 19    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 20    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 21    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 22    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 23    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 24    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 25    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 26    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017,   SB3918- 75 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 2    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 3    exemption under paragraph (14).4        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 5    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 6    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 7    provisions of Section 2-70.8        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 9    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 10    secondary school located in Illinois.11        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 12    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 13    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.14        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 15    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 16    the county fair.17        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 18    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 19    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 20    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 21    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 22    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 23    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 24    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 25    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 26    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils,   SB3918- 76 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 2    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 3    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 4    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 5    an active identification number issued by the Department.6        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 7    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 8    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 9    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 10    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 11    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 12    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.13        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 14    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 15    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 16    institution organized and operated exclusively for 17    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 18    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 19    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 20    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 21    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 22    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 23    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 24    limited liability company is organized and operated 25    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 26    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this   SB3918- 77 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 2    active identification number issued by the Department.3        (12) (Blank).4        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 5    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 6    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 7    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 8    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 9    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 10    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 11    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 12    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 13    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 14    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 15    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 16    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 17    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 18    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 19    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 20    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 21    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 22    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 23    or not. 24        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 25    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 26    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as   SB3918- 78 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 2    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 3    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 4    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 5    moving in interstate commerce.6        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 7    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 8    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 9    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 10    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 11    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 12    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 13    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 14    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 15    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 16    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 17    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 18    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 19    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 20    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 21    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 22    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 23    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 24    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 25    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 26    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of   SB3918- 79 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 2    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 3    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 4    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 5    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.6        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 7    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 8    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 9    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 10    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 11    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 12    food or beverage function with respect to which the 13    service charge is imposed. 14        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 15    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 16    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 17    of Section 2-70. 18        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 19    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 20    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 21    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 22    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 23    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 24    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 25    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.26        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or   SB3918- 80 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 2    government of the United States of America, or the 3    government of any foreign country, and bullion.4        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 5    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 6    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 7    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 8    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 9    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 10    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 11    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 12    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 13    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.14        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 15    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 16    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 17    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 18    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 19    purchased for lease.20        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 21    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 22    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 23    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 24    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 25    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 26    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on   SB3918- 81 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 2    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 3    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 4    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 5    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).6        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 7    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 8    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 9    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 10    flight destined for or returning from a location or 11    locations outside the United States without regard to 12    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.13        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 14    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 15    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 16    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 17    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 18    in trade between the United States and any of its 19    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 20    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 21    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 22    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 23        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 24    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 25    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 26    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.  SB3918- 82 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 2    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 3    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 4    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 5    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 6    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.7        (25) Except as provided in items (25-5) and (25-6) of 8    this Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 9    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to 10    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 11    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 12    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 13    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 14    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 15    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 16    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 17    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 18    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 19    titled in this State.20        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 21    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 22    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 23    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 24    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 25    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 26    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption   SB3918- 83 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 2    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 3    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 4    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 5    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 6    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 7    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 8    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 9    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 10    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 11    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 12    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 13    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 14    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 15    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 16    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 17    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 18    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 19    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 20    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 21    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 22    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 23    general rate imposed under this Act. 24        (25-6) There is a rebuttable presumption that the 25    exemption under item (25) does not apply if the purchaser 26    is a limited liability company and a member of the limited   SB3918- 84 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    liability company is a resident of Illinois. This 2    presumption may be rebutted by other evidence, such as 3    evidence the motor vehicle is insured at a garaging or 4    storage address outside Illinois or other evidence of the 5    physical address at which the motor vehicle will be 6    permanently stored or garaged outside Illinois. 7        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 8    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 9    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 10    following conditions are met:11            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 12        after the later of either the issuance of the final 13        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 14        authorized approval for return to service, completion 15        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 16        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 17        required by 14 CFR 91.407;18            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 19        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and20            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 21        records and provides to the Department a signed and 22        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 23        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 24        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 25        certificate must also include the name and address of 26        the purchaser, the address of the location where the   SB3918- 85 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 2        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 3        other information that the Department may reasonably 4        require.5        For purposes of this item (25-7):6        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 7    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 8    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 9    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 10    of the aircraft.11        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 12    registered with the Department of Transportation, 13    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 14    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 15    this State.16        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 17    Section 2-70. 18        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 19    livestock for direct agricultural production.20        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 21    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 22    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 23    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 24    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 25    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 26    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the   SB3918- 86 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 2    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 3    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 4    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 5    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 6    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 7    95-88).8        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 9    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 10    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 11    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 12    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 13    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 14    exemption identification number by the Department under 15    Section 1g of this Act.16        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 17    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 18    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 19    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 20    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 21    of this Act.22        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 23    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 24    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 25    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 26    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering   SB3918- 87 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 2    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 3    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 4    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 5    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 6    declared disaster area.7        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 8    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 9    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 10    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 11    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 12    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 13    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 14    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 15    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 16    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 17    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 18    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 19    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.20        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 21    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 22    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 23    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.24        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 25    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 26    donated to a corporation, limited liability company,   SB3918- 88 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 2    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 3    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 4    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 5    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 6    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 7    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 8    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 9    learning by methods common to public schools and that 10    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 11    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 12    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 13    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 14    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 15    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 16    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 17    occupation.18        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 19    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 20    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 21    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 22    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 23    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 24    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 25    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 26    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home   SB3918- 89 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 2    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 3    another individual or entity that sold the property for 4    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 5    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 6    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.7        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 8    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 9    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 10    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 11    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 12    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 13    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 14    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 15    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 16    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 17    from the provisions of Section 2-70.18        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 19    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 20    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 21    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 22    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 23    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 24    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 25    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 26    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V   SB3918- 90 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 2    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 3    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 4    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 5    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.6        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 7    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 8    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 9    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 10    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 11    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 12    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 13    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 14    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15    of Section 2-70.16        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 17    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 18    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 19    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 20    active tax exemption identification number by the 21    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 22    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.23        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 24    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 25    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 26    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt   SB3918- 91 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 2    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 3    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 4    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 5    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 6    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 7    personal property to be transported outside this State and 8    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 9    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 10    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 11    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 12    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 13    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 14    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 15    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 16    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 17    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 18    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 19    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 20    property outside of the State of Illinois.21        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 22    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 23    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 24    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 25    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 26    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental   SB3918- 92 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 2    provisions of Section 2-70. 3        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 4    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 5    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 6    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 7    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 8    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 9    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 10    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 11    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 12    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 13    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 14    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 15    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 16    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 17    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 18    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 19    latex gloves, and protective films. 20        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 21    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 22    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 23    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 24    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 25    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 26    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV   SB3918- 93 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 2    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 3    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 4    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 5    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 6    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 7    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 8    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 9    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 10    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 11    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 12    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 13    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 14    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 15    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 16    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 17    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 18    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 19    item (A).20        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 21    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 22    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 23    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 24    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 25    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 26    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015   SB3918- 94 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 2    Public Act 101-629).3        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 4    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 5    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 6    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 7    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 8    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 9    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 10    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 11    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 12    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 13    corporation in connection with the development of the 14    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 15    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 16    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 17    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 18        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 19    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 20        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 21    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 22    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 23    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 24    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 25    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 26    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from   SB3918- 95 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    the provisions of Section 2-70.2        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 3    construction or operation of a data center that has been 4    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 5    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 6    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 7    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 8    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 9    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 10    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 11    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 12    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 13    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 14    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 15    or leased in the original investment that would have 16    qualified. 17        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 18    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 19    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 20    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 21    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 22    Illinois. 23        For the purposes of this item (44): 24            "Data center" means a building or a series of 25        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 26        working servers in one physical location or multiple   SB3918- 96 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1        sites within the State of Illinois. 2            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 3        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 4        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 5        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 6        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 7        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 8        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 9        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 10        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 11        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 12        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 13        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 14        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 15        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 16        any of the foregoing, including installation, 17        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 18        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 19        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 20        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 21        property; and all other tangible personal property 22        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 23        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 24        property" also includes building materials physically 25        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 26        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the   SB3918- 97 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 2        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 3        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 4        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 5    Section 2-70. 6        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 7    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 8    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 9    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 10    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 11    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 12    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 13    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 14    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 15    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 16    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 17    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 18    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 19    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 20    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 21    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 22    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 23        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 24    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 25    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 26    2-70. As used in this item (46):   SB3918- 98 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 2    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 3    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 4    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 5    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 6    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 7    time of sale. 8        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 9    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 10    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 11    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 12    milk until it is ready for consumption. 13        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 14    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 15    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 16    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 17    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 18    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 19    milk storage bags. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 21    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 22    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 23    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 24    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 25    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 26    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams,   SB3918- 99 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 2    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 3    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 4    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 5    or distributor. 6        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 7    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 8    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 9    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 10    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 11    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 12    manufacturer or distributor. 13        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 14    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 15    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 16    provisions of Section 2-70. 17        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 18    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 19    forces of the United States who presents valid military 20    identification and purchases the property using a form of 21    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 22    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 23    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 24    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 25    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 26    form as documentation of the exemption in their records   SB3918- 100 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 2    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 3    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 4    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 5        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 6    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 7    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 8    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 9    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 10    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 11    the provisions of Section 2-70. 12        (50) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 13    in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that is to be 14    consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 15    alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with 16    adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has 17    been prepared for immediate consumption). This item (50) 18    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 19        (51) Gross receipts from the lease of the following 20    tangible personal property:21            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 22        license that meets the following requirements:23                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 24            signed by the licensor and the customer;25                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 26                customer accepts the license by means of an   SB3918- 101 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1                electronic signature that is verifiable and 2                can be authenticated and is attached to or 3                made part of the license will comply with this 4                requirement;5                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 6                customer electronically accepts the terms by 7                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 8                requirement;9                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 10            and use of the software;11                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 12            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 13            third party (except to a related party) without 14            the permission and continued control of the 15            licensor;16                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 17            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 18            customer loses or damages the software, or of 19            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 20            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 21            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 22            books and records, or supported by a notarized 23            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 24            licensor; and25                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 26            copies of the software to the licensor at the end   SB3918- 102 -LRB104 19344 HLH 32791 b1            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 2            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 3            without being set forth in the license agreement; 4            and5            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 6        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 7        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 8        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 9        (51) Tangible personal property to be incorporated 10    into the construction of a single-family home in the State 11    by a home builder who has been issued a certificate of 12    exemption by the Illinois Housing Development Authority 13    under Section 33.1 of the Illinois Housing Development 14    Act. This item (51) is exempt from the provisions of 15    Section 2-70. 16(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-20, eff. 6-7-23; 17103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 186-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 19eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 20103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-6, eff. 216-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)